zh-TW: 橄欖球尺寸: 中號; 兒童; 迷你; 單一尺寸; 成人; 女款; 青少年; 其他
sl-SI: Ragbi velikost: Vmesna; Mladinska; Mini; Univerzalna velikost; Članska; Ženska; Otroška; Drugo
it: Taglia da rugby: Intermedio; Junior; Mini; Taglia unica; Senior; Donna; Ragazzo; Altro
sv: Rugby-storlek: Mellan; Junior; Mini; One size; Senior; Dam; Ungdom; Övrigt
hu: Rögbiméret: Közepes; Junior; Mini; Egy méret; Senior; Női; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
pt-BR: Rúgbi tamanho: Intermediário; Júnior; Mini; Tamanho único; Sênior; Feminino; Juvenil; Outros
ja: ラグビーサイズ: インターミディエイト; ジュニア; ミニ; ワンサイズ; シニア; ウィメンズ; ユース; その他
es: Talla para rugby: Intermedio; Junior; Mini; Talla única; Senior; Mujer; Juvenil; Otro
tr: Ragbi beden ölçüsü: Orta; Küçük; Mini; Tek beden; Yetişkin; Kadın; Genç; Diğer
pl: Rozmiar rugby: Średnie; Junior; Mini; Jeden rozmiar; Senior; Damskie; Młodzieżowe; Inne
ru: Размер для регби: Средний; Юниорский; Мини; Единый размер; Взрослый; Женский; Юношеский; Другое
en: Rugby size: Intermediate; Junior; Mini; One size; Senior; Women; Youth; Other
th: ขนาดรักบี้: ระดับกลาง; เด็กโต; มินิ; ไซส์เดียว; ผู้ใหญ่; ผู้หญิง; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
el: Μέγεθος ράγκμπι: Ενδιάμεσο; Junior; Mini; One size; Senior; Γυναίκες; Νέοι; Άλλο
vi: Kích thước bóng rugby: Trung bình; Thiếu niên; Mini; Một kích thước; Người lớn; Nữ; Trẻ em; Khác
bg-BG: Размер на ръгби топка: Среден; Юношески; Мини; Един размер; За възрастни; Дамски; Младежки; Друго
de: Rugbygröße: Intermediate; Junior; Mini; Einheitsgröße; Senior; Damen; Jugend; Sonstiges
nl: Rugby maat: Intermediate; Junior; Mini; One size; Senior; Vrouwen; Jeugd; Overig
hr-HR: Veličina ragbija: Srednja veličina; Juniori; Mini; Univerzalna veličina; Seniori; Žene; Mladi; Ostalo
da: Rugby-størrelse: Mellem; Junior; Mini; One size; Senior; Kvinder; Ungdom; Andet
ro-RO: Mărime pentru rugby: Intermediar; Junior; Mini; Mărime universală; Senior; Femei; Tineret; Altele
lt-LT: Regbio dydis: Vidutinis; Jaunių; Mini; Vieno dydžio; Suaugusiųjų; Moterų; Jaunimo; Kita
pt-PT: Tamanho para râguebi: Intermédio; Júnior; Mini; Tamanho único; Sénior; Mulher; Juvenil; Outro
cs: Velikost ragby: Střední; Junior; Mini; Univerzální velikost; Senior; Dámské; Mládež; Jiné
sk-SK: Ragbyová veľkosť: Stredná; Juniorská; Mini; Jedna veľkosť; Seniorská; Ženy; Mládež; Iné
nb: Rugbystørrelse: Mellomnivå; Junior; Mini; One size; Senior; Kvinner; Ungdom; Annet
fi: Rugbyvarusteiden kokomerkintä: Intermediate; Juniori; Mini; Yksi koko; Seniori; Naiset; Nuoret; Muu
fr: Taille de rugby: Intermédiaire; Junior; Mini; Taille unique; Senior; Femmes; Jeunes; Autre
zh-CN: 橄榄球尺寸: 中号; 青少年; 迷你; 均码; 成人; 女士; 青年; 其他
ko: 럭비 사이즈: 인터미디어트; 주니어; 미니; 원사이즈; 시니어; 여성용; 유소년용; 기타